ubuntu.slaves.black/1/packages/xuxen-eu-spell/src/myspell/eu-ES.aff
SFX t  0      koentzat          .
SFX t  0      koetaraino          .
SFX t  0      koetarantz          .
SFX t  0      koetarat          .
SFX t  0      koetara          .
SFX t  0      koetatik          .
SFX t  0      koetan          .
SFX t  0      koetarik          .
SFX t  0      koez          .
SFX t  0      kogatik          .
SFX t  0      kooi          .
SFX t  0      kook          .
SFX t  0      kookin          .
SFX t  0      koontzat          .
SFX t  0      kootaz          .
SFX t  0      kooz          .
SFX t  0      kotzat          .
SFX t  0      kok          .
SFX t  0      kotaraino          .
SFX t  0      kotarantz          .
SFX t  0      kotarat          .
SFX t  0      kotara          .
SFX t  0      kotatik          .
SFX t  0      kotan          .
SFX t  0      kotarik          .
SFX t  0      koz          .
SFX t  0      korekin          .
SFX t  0      korendako          .
SFX t  0      korentzat          .
SFX t  0      kori          .
SFX t  0      korik          .
SFX t  0      koan          .
SFX t  0      koraino          .
SFX t  0      korantz          .
SFX t  0      korat          .
SFX t  0      kora          .
SFX t  0      kotik          .
SFX t  0      raino          .
SFX t  0      rainoko          .
SFX t  0      rantz          .
SFX t  0      rantzago          .
SFX t  0      rantzegi          .
SFX t  0      ranzko          .
SFX t  0      rat          .
SFX t  0      rako          .
SFX t  0      ra          .
SFX t  0      rago          .
SFX t  0      tik          .
SFX t  0      tiko          .
SFX u Y 292
SFX u  0      a          .
SFX u  0      ak          .
SFX u  0      arekin          .
SFX u  0      arekiko          .
SFX u  0      arendako          .
SFX u  0      arentzat          .
SFX u  0      arentzako          .
SFX u  0      aren          .
SFX u  0      arena          .
SFX u  0      arenak          .
SFX u  0      arenarekin          .
SFX u  0      arenarendako          .
SFX u  0      arenarentzat          .
SFX u  0      arenari          .
SFX u  0      arenaz          .
SFX u  0      arenei          .
SFX u  0      arenek          .
SFX u  0      arenekin          .
SFX u  0      arenendako          .
SFX u  0      arenentzat          .
SFX u  0      arenetaraino          .
SFX u  0      arenetarantz          .
SFX u  0      arenetarat          .
SFX u  0      arenetara          .
SFX u  0      arenetatik          .
SFX u  0      arenetan          .
SFX u  0      arenetarik          .
SFX u  0      arenez          .
SFX u  0      arengan          .
SFX u  0      arengana          .
SFX u  0      arenganaino          .
SFX u  0      arenganantz          .
SFX u  0      arengandik          .
SFX u  0      arengatik          .
SFX u  0      arenoi          .
SFX u  0      arenok          .
SFX u  0      arenokin          .
SFX u  0      arenontzat          .
SFX u  0      arenotaz          .
SFX u  0      arenoz          .
SFX u  0      areni          .
SFX u  0      arenik          .
SFX u  0      arenean          .
SFX u  0      areneraino          .
SFX u  0      arenerantz          .
SFX u  0      arenerat          .
SFX u  0      arenera          .
SFX u  0      arenetik          .
SFX u  0      ari          .
SFX u  0      az          .
SFX u  0      agan          .
SFX u  0      agana          .
SFX u  0      aganaino          .
SFX u  0      aganantz          .
SFX u  0      agandik          .
SFX u  0      agatik          .
SFX u  0      ei          .
SFX u  0      ek          .
SFX u  0      ekin          .
SFX u  0      ekiko          .
SFX u  0      endako          .
SFX u  0      entzat          .
SFX u  0      entzako          .
SFX u  0      etako          .
SFX u  0      etakoa          .
SFX u  0      etakoago          .
SFX u  0      etakoak          .
SFX u  0      etakoarekin          .
SFX u  0      etakoarendako          .
SFX u  0      etakoarentzat          .
SFX u  0      etakoari          .
SFX u  0      etakoaz          .
SFX u  0      etakoegi          .
SFX u  0      etakoei          .
SFX u  0      etakoek          .
SFX u  0      etakoekin          .
SFX u  0      etakoendako          .
SFX u  0      etakoentzat          .
SFX u  0      etakoetaraino          .
SFX u  0      etakoetarantz          .
SFX u  0      etakoetarat          .
SFX u  0      etakoetara          .
SFX u  0      etakoetatik          .
SFX u  0      etakoetan          .
SFX u  0      etakoetarik          .
SFX u  0      etakoez          .
SFX u  0      etakogatik          .
SFX u  0      etakooi          .
SFX u  0      etakook          .
SFX u  0      etakookin          .
SFX u  0      etakoontzat          .
SFX u  0      etakootaz          .
SFX u  0      etakooz          .
SFX u  0      etakotzat          .
SFX u  0      etakok          .
SFX u  0      etakotaraino          .
SFX u  0      etakotarantz          .
SFX u  0      etakotarat          .
SFX u  0      etakotara          .
SFX u  0      etakotatik          .
SFX u  0      etakotan          .
SFX u  0      etakotarik          .
SFX u  0      etakoz          .
SFX u  0      etakorekin          .
SFX u  0      etakorendako          .
SFX u  0      etakorentzat          .
SFX u  0      etakori          .
SFX u  0      etakorik          .
SFX u  0      etakoan          .
SFX u  0      etakoraino          .
SFX u  0      etakorantz          .
SFX u  0      etakorat          .
SFX u  0      etakora          .
SFX u  0      etakotik          .
SFX u  0      etaraino          .
SFX u  0      etarainoko          .
SFX u  0      etarantz          .
SFX u  0      etarantzago          .
SFX u  0      etarantzegi          .
SFX u  0      etaranzko          .
SFX u  0      etarat          .
SFX u  0      etarako          .
SFX u  0      etara          .
SFX u  0      etarago          .
SFX u  0      etatik          .
SFX u  0      etatiko          .
SFX u  0      etan          .
SFX u  0      etarik          .
SFX u  0      etariko          .
SFX u  0      ez          .
SFX u  0      en          .
SFX u  0      ena          .
SFX u  0      enak          .
SFX u  0      enarekin          .
SFX u  0      enarendako          .
SFX u  0      enarentzat          .
SFX u  0      enari          .
SFX u  0      enaz          .
SFX u  0      enei          .
SFX u  0      enek          .
SFX u  0      enekin          .
SFX u  0      enendako          .
SFX u  0      enentzat          .
SFX u  0      enetaraino          .
SFX u  0      enetarantz          .
SFX u  0      enetarat          .
SFX u  0      enetara          .
SFX u  0      enetatik          .
SFX u  0      enetan          .
SFX u  0      enetarik          .
SFX u  0      enez          .
SFX u  0      engan          .
SFX u  0      engana          .
SFX u  0      enganaino          .
SFX u  0      enganantz          .
SFX u  0      engandik          .
SFX u  0      engatik          .
SFX u  0      enoi          .
SFX u  0      enok          .
SFX u  0      enokin          .
SFX u  0      enontzat          .
SFX u  0      enotaz          .
SFX u  0      enoz          .
SFX u  0      eni          .
SFX u  0      enik          .
SFX u  0      enean          .
SFX u  0      eneraino          .
SFX u  0      enerantz          .
SFX u  0      enerat          .
SFX u  0      enera          .
SFX u  0      enetik          .
SFX u  0      gatik          .
SFX u  0      gatiko          .
SFX u  0      oi          .
SFX u  0      ok          .
SFX u  0      okin          .
SFX u  0      okiko          .
SFX u  0      ontzat          .
SFX u  0      ontzako          .
SFX u  0      otaz          .
SFX u  0      otako          .
SFX u  0      otaraino          .
SFX u  0      otarantz          .
SFX u  0      otarat          .
SFX u  0      otara          .
SFX u  0      otatik          .
SFX u  0      otan          .
SFX u  0      otarik          .
SFX u  0      oz          .
SFX u  0      on          .
SFX u  0      ona          .
SFX u  0      onak          .
SFX u  0      onarekin          .
SFX u  0      onarendako          .
SFX u  0      onarentzat          .
SFX u  0      onari          .
SFX u  0      onaz          .
SFX u  0      onei          .
SFX u  0      onek          .
SFX u  0      onekin          .
SFX u  0      onendako          .
SFX u  0      onentzat          .
SFX u  0      onez          .
SFX u  0      ongan          .
SFX u  0      ongana          .
SFX u  0      onganaino          .
SFX u  0      onganantz          .
SFX u  0      ongandik          .
SFX u  0      ongatik          .
SFX u  0      onoi          .
SFX u  0      onok          .
SFX u  0      onokin          .
SFX u  0      onontzat          .
SFX u  0      onotaz          .
SFX u  0      onoz          .
SFX u  0      oni          .
SFX u  0      onik          .
SFX u  0      onean          .
SFX u  0      oneraino          .
SFX u  0      onerantz          .
SFX u  0      onerat          .
SFX u  0      onera          .
SFX u  0      onetik          .
SFX u  0      tzat          .
SFX u  0      ezko          .
SFX u  0      egatik          .
SFX u  0      i          .
SFX u  0      ik          .
SFX u  0      ean          .
SFX u  0      eko          .
SFX u  0      ekoa          .
SFX u  0      ekoago          .
SFX u  0      ekoak          .
SFX u  0      ekoarekin          .
SFX u  0      ekoarendako          .
SFX u  0      ekoarentzat          .
SFX u  0      ekoari          .
SFX u  0      ekoaz          .
SFX u  0      ekoegi          .
SFX u  0      ekoei          .
SFX u  0      ekoek          .
SFX u  0      ekoekin          .
SFX u  0      ekoendako          .
SFX u  0      ekoentzat          .
SFX u  0      ekoetaraino          .
SFX u  0      ekoetarantz          .
SFX u  0      ekoetarat          .
SFX u  0      ekoetara          .
SFX u  0      ekoetatik          .
SFX u  0      ekoetan          .
SFX u  0      ekoetarik          .
SFX u  0      ekoez          .
SFX u  0      ekogatik          .
SFX u  0      ekooi          .
SFX u  0      ekook          .
SFX u  0      ekookin          .
SFX u  0      ekoontzat          .
SFX u  0      ekootaz          .
SFX u  0      ekooz          .
SFX u  0      ekotzat          .
SFX u  0      ekok          .
SFX u  0      ekotaraino          .
SFX u  0      ekotarantz          .
SFX u  0      ekotarat          .
SFX u  0      ekotara          .
SFX u  0      ekotatik          .
SFX u  0      ekotan          .
SFX u  0      ekotarik          .
SFX u  0      ekoz          .
SFX u  0      ekorekin          .
SFX u  0      ekorendako          .
SFX u  0      ekorentzat          .
SFX u  0      ekori          .
SFX u  0      ekorik          .
SFX u  0      ekoan          .
SFX u  0      ekoraino          .
SFX u  0      ekorantz          .
SFX u  0      ekorat          .
SFX u  0      ekora          .
SFX u  0      ekotik          .
SFX u  0      eraino          .
SFX u  0      erainoko          .
SFX u  0      erantz          .
SFX u  0      erantzago          .
SFX u  0      erantzegi          .
SFX u  0      eranzko          .
SFX u  0      erat          .
SFX u  0      erako          .
SFX u  0      era          .
SFX u  0      erago          .
SFX u  0      etik          .
SFX u  0      etiko          .
